Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.1691, subdivision 2g, is amended to read: Subd. 2g. Carbon-free standard. new text begin (a) new text end In addition to the requirements under subdivisions 2a and 2f, each electric utility must generate or procure sufficient electricity generated from a carbon-free energy technology to provide the electric utility's retail customers in Minnesota, or the retail customers of a distribution utility to which the electric utility provides wholesale electric service, so that the electric utility generates or procures an amount of electricity from carbon-free energy technologies that is equivalent to at least the following standard percentages of the electric utility's total retail electric sales to retail customers in Minnesota by the end of the year indicated: (1) 2030 80 percent for public utilities; 60 percent for other electric utilities (2) 2035 90 percent for all electric utilities (3) 2040 100 percent for all electric utilities. new text begin (b) This subdivision does not apply to electricity generated outside of Minnesota. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end